Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.370

Operating agency board of directors—Members, appointment, vote, term, etc.—Rules—Proceedings—Limitation on powers and duties.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the management and control of an operating agency shall be vested in a board of directors, herein sometimes referred to as the board. The legislative body of each member of an operating agency shall appoint a representative who may, at the discretion of the member and regardless of any charter or other provision to the contrary, be an officer or employee of the member, to serve on the board of the operating agency. Each representative shall have one vote and shall have, in addition thereto, one vote for each block of electric energy equal to ten percent of the total energy generated by the agency during the preceding year purchased by the member represented by such representative. Each member may appoint an alternative representative to serve in the absence or disability of its representative. Each representative shall serve at the pleasure of the member. The board of an operating agency shall elect from its members a president, vice president and secretary, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The president and secretary shall perform the same duties with respect to the operating agency as are provided by law for the president and secretary, respectively, of public utility districts, and such other duties as may be provided by motion, rule or resolution of the board. The board of an operating agency shall adopt rules for the conduct of its meetings and the carrying out of its business, and adopt an official seal. All proceedings of an operating agency shall be by motion or resolution and shall be recorded in the minute book which shall be a public record. A majority of the board members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. A majority of the votes which the members present are entitled to cast shall be necessary and sufficient to pass any motion or resolution: PROVIDED, That such board members are entitled to cast a majority of the votes of all members of the board. The members of the board of an operating agency may be compensated by such agency as is provided in RCW 43.52.290: PROVIDED, That the compensation to any member shall not exceed five thousand dollars in any year except for board members who are elected to serve on an executive board established under RCW 43.52.374.

(2) If an operating agency is constructing, operating, terminating, or decommissioning a nuclear power plant under a site certification agreement under chapter 80.50 RCW, the powers and duties of the board of directors shall include and are limited to the following:

(a) Final authority on any decision of the operating agency to purchase, acquire, construct, terminate, or decommission any power plants, works, and facilities except that once the board of directors has made a final decision regarding a nuclear power plant, the executive board established under RCW 43.52.374 shall have the authority to make all subsequent decisions regarding the plant and any of its components;

(b) Election of members to, removal from, and establishment of salaries for the elected members of the executive board under RCW 43.52.374(1)(a); and

(c) Selection and appointment of three outside directors as provided in RCW 43.52.374(1)(b).

All other powers and duties of the operating agency, including without limitation authority for all actions subsequent to final decisions by the board of directors, including but not limited to the authority to sell any power plant, works, and facilities are vested in the executive board established under RCW 43.52.374.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 3 s 2; 1982 1st ex.s. c 43 s 2; 1981 1st ex.s. c 3 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 184 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.52.370. Prior: 1957 c 295 s 2; 1953 c 281 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—1982 1st ex.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.52.374.